Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.095

Registered agent.

Effective January 1, 1990, every association subject to this chapter shall have and maintain a registered agent in this state in accordance with the requirements set forth in Article 4 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 9106; 1989 c 307 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.